Maryland, session 2025, SB0311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–708.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER” INCLUDES:
(I) A PARENT;
(II) A SPOUSE; AND
(III) A CHILD.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0311*

SENATE BILL 311
(3) “Local official” means an individual serving in a publicly elected office
of a local government unit, as defined in § 10–101 of the State Government Article.
[(3)] (4) (i) “State official” has the meaning stated in § 5–101 of the
General Provisions Article.
(ii) “State official” includes the Governor, Governor–elect,
Lieutenant Governor, and Lieutenant Governor–elect.
[(4)] (5) “Threat” includes:
(i) an oral threat; or
(ii) a threat in any written form, whether or not the writing is signed,
or if the writing is signed, whether or not it is signed with a fictitious name or any other
mark.
(b) A person may not knowingly and willfully make a threat to take the life of,
kidnap, or cause physical injury to:
(1) a State official[,];
(2) a local official[,];
(3) a deputy State’s Attorney[,];
(4) an assistant State’s Attorney[, or];
(5) an assistant Public Defender; OR
(6) AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF AN INDIVIDUAL LISTED IN
ITEM (1), (2), (3), (4), OR (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(c) A person may not knowingly send, deliver, part with, or make for the purpose
of sending or delivering a threat prohibited under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a fine not exceeding $2,500 or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.